Utah statutes.
10-8-64.   Livestock at large -- Pound -- Distraint.
(1)  A municipality may, within the limits of the municipality:
(a)  regulate or prohibit the running at large of livestock and poultry;
(b) (i)  establish a pound;
(ii)  appoint a poundkeeper; and
(iii)  prescribe the poundkeeper's duties;
(c)  distrain and impound animals running at large; and
(d)  provide for the sale or disposition of animals running at large as
provided by law for the sale and disposition of estrays and trespassing
animals.
(2)  The proceeds arising from the sale of animals running at large, after the
payment of all costs, shall go to the city treasurer to be disposed of
according to law.
